Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.305.905

Transfer of duties between the state board of education and superintendent of public instruction—Validity of actions, funds apportionment, and collective bargaining.

(1) The transfer of powers, duties, and functions of the superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education pursuant to chapter 177, Laws of 2018 do not affect the validity of any superintendent of public instruction or state board of education action performed before June 7, 2018.

(2) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfer of powers, duties, and functions directed by chapter 177, Laws of 2018, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the director's certification.

(3) Unless otherwise provided, nothing contained in chapter 177, Laws of 2018 may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel resources board as provided by law.

[ 2018 c 177 s 702.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2018 c 177: "The legislature finds that specific powers, duties, and functions of the state board of education and the superintendent of public instruction should be realigned to better serve students and families, educators, school districts, and schools both public and private.

The legislature recognizes that the state board of education and the superintendent of public instruction, with the support of the governor's office, convened a roles and responsibilities task force to review their authorities and made recommendations to clarify and realign responsibilities among the agencies.

The legislature, therefore, intends to clarify, and in some cases shift, responsibilities related to private schools, educational service district boundaries, career and technical education equivalencies, adoption of learning standards, waiver of school district requirements, and compliance with basic education requirements." [ 2018 c 177 s 1.]